Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6141HV (1) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2441 Section 1. Section 256.218, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 256.218, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. For each fiscal year beginning on or 5 after July 1, 2026, of the moneys awarded pursuant to the teach 6 Iowa scholar fund, all of the following shall apply: 7 a. Twenty percent shall be awarded to eligible classroom 8 teachers who provide special education instruction. 9 b. Fifty percent shall be awarded to eligible classroom 10 teachers who are employed by a rural school district. For 11 purposes of this paragraph, ârural school districtâ means a 12 school district with a certified enrollment of fewer than one 13 thousand students. 14